Washington statutes.
RCW 32.20.210

Obligations of International Bank for Reconstruction and Development.

A mutual savings bank may invest not to exceed five percent of its funds in interest bearing obligations of the International Bank for Reconstruction and Development.

[ 1955 c 13 s 32.20.210. Prior: 1949 c 119 s 3; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 3381-16b.]